Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 24 The Green Buildings Act

37-24-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as “The Green Buildings Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 212, § 1.

37-24-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared as follows:

Energy costs for public buildings and public projects are skyrocketing and will likely continue to increase.

Energy use by public buildings and public projects contributes substantially to the problems of pollution and global warming.

Public buildings, public structures, public real property and public projects can be built, renovated, and located using high-performance methods that save and generate energy; reduce and conserve water consumption; improve indoor air and environmental quality; improve water quality; reduce transportation demand and emissions; preserve the environment; make workers and students more productive; and improve the quality of our individual and shared human experience and environmental justice for all citizens of the state.

The green buildings act is a strategic tool to achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets and other objectives of chapter 6.2 of title 42 (“2021 act on climate”) and the work of the executive climate change coordinating council established in §

42-6.2-1

.

This law is necessary to more efficiently spend public funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

37-24-3.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Construction” means the process of building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing forty percent (40%) or more of any public structures, public buildings, public real property or other public improvements of any kind to any public structures, public buildings or public real property.

“Department” means the department of administration.

“Equivalent standard” means a high-performance green building standard, other than LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES, that provides an independent, third-party verification and certification of a rating system or measurement tool, that, when used, leads to outcomes equivalent to, LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES outcomes, in terms of green building, green infrastructure, and green site performance; current accepted equivalent standards include green globes, Northeast collaborative high-performance schools protocol; or other equivalent high-performance green building, green infrastructure, and green site standards accepted by the department.

“LEED” also, “LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES certified standard” means the current version of the U.S. Green Building Council Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) green building rating standard referred to as LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES certified. SITES means the U.S. Green Building Council’s SITES — The Sustainable SITES Initiative.

“Public agency” means every state or municipal office, board, commission, committee, bureau, department, or public institution of education, or any political subdivision thereof.

“Public facility” means any public institution, public facility, public equipment, or any physical asset owned, including its public real-property site, leased or controlled in whole or in part by this state, a public agency, a municipality or a political subdivision, that is for public or government use.

“Public major facility project” means:

A public facility building construction project larger than ten thousand (10,000) gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space, and its public real-property site; or

A public facility building renovation project larger than ten thousand (10,000) gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space, and its public real-property site.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 39; P.L. 2017, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

37-24-4.
Green building standards.

All public major facility projects of the state, public agencies, municipalities and political subdivisions shall be designed and constructed to at least the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES, as provided herein, certified or an equivalent high-performance green building standard. This provision applies to public major facility projects or other public improvements of any kind to any public facility that have not entered the design phase prior to July 1, 2023, for LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development and for SITES.

All public major facility projects of a public school facility, where the project receives any funding from the state, shall be designed and constructed to at least the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES, as provided herein, certified standard, or the Northeast Collaborative for High-Performance Schools Protocol, Version 1.1 or above. This provision applies to public major facility projects or other public improvements by the state or a public school district to any public school facility that have not entered the design phase prior to July 1, 2023, for LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and for SITES.

A public major facility project does not have to meet the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES certified standard or an equivalent high-performance green building standard if:

There is no appropriate LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES standard or other high-performance green building standard for that type of building or renovation project or other public improvements of any kind to any public facility. In such case, the department will set green building standards that are appropriate to the project.

There is no practical way to apply the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES standard or other high-performance green building standard to a particular building or renovation project or other public improvements of any kind to any public facility. In such case, the department will set green building standards that are appropriate to the project.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

37-24-5.
Administration and reports — Green buildings advisory committee.

The department shall promulgate such regulations as are necessary to enforce this section by January 1, 2023. Those regulations shall include how the department will determine whether a project qualifies for an exception from the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES certified or equivalent high-performance green building standard, and the green building standards that may be imposed on projects that are granted exceptions.

The department shall monitor and document ongoing operating savings that result from major facility projects designed, constructed, and certified as meeting the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES certified standard annually publish a public report of findings and recommended changes in policy. The report shall also include a description of projects that were granted exceptions from the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES certified standard, the reasons for exception, and the lesser green building standards imposed.

— (f) [Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1.]

A green buildings advisory committee shall be created composed of nineteen (19) members. The advisory committee shall have eleven (11) public members and eight (8) public agency members. Five (5) of the public members shall be appointed by the governor; three (3) of the public members shall be appointed by the president of the senate; and, three (3) of the public members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

The eleven (11) public members of the advisory committee shall be composed of nine (9) representatives one from each of the following fields: architecture, engineering, landscape architecture, energy, labor through the Rhode Island AFL-CIO, general construction contracting, building product and building materials industries who are involved in, and have recognized knowledge and accomplishment in their respective professions, of high-performance green building standards, relating to the standards set forth in §

37-24-4

; in addition to two (2) public members, one representing an urban municipality from Providence, Cranston, Warwick, Pawtucket, Woonsocket, or Newport, and one public member representing the other thirty-two (32) municipalities in the state in order to ensure geographic diversity.

The advisory committee shall have eight (8) public agency members representing personnel from affected public agencies, and cities and towns, that oversee public works projects and workforce development, who shall be appointed by the directors or chief executive officers of the respective public agencies which shall include the department of administration; the department of environmental management; the department of education; the department of transportation; the department of labor and training; the office of the state building code commissioner; the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, and the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns.

The chairperson of the green buildings advisory committee shall be a public member chosen by the green buildings advisory committee.

Of the initial eleven (11) public members, six (6) shall serve three-year (3) terms and five (5) shall have two-year (2) terms. Each appointing authority shall appoint two (2) public members to three-year (3) terms with the remainder of the public member appointments serving two-year terms. Thereafter, all public members shall be appointed to three-year (3) terms.

The green buildings advisory committee shall:

Make recommendations regarding an ongoing evaluation process of the green buildings act to help the department and the executive climate change coordinating council implement this chapter;

Identify the needs, actions, and funding required to implement the requirements set forth in this chapter, in achieving high-performance green building projects for our public buildings, public structures, and our public real properties;

Establish clear, measurable targets for implementing the standards, defined in this chapter, for all public major facility projects including timeline, workforce needs, anticipated costs and other measures identified by the green buildings advisory committee and required by chapter 6.2 of title 42 (“2021 act on climate”); and

Identify ways to monitor and document ongoing operating savings and greenhouse gas emission reductions that result from public major facility projects designed, constructed and certified as meeting the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, SITES certified standard, Green Globes, Northeast Collaborative for High-Performance Schools Protocol, Version 1.1 or above and annually publish a report to the general assembly and the executive climate change coordinating council of findings and recommended changes in policy.

All requests for proposals, requests for information, requests for bids, requests for design/build, requests for construction managers, and any requests relating to obtaining the professional services, pricing, and construction for major facility projects by a public agency for a public facility, shall include the notice of the statutory requirements of this chapter (“the green buildings act”).

The green buildings advisory committee shall have no responsibility for, and shall not develop requests for proposals, requests for information, requests for bids, requests for design/build, requests for construction managers, and any requests relating to obtaining the professional services, pricing, and construction for major facility projects by a public agency for a public facility; and the green buildings advisory committee shall have no responsibility for, and shall not select any vendors for any requests for proposals, requests for information, requests for bids, requests for design/build, requests for construction managers, and any requests relating to obtaining the professional services, pricing, and construction for major facility projects by a public agency for a public facility. Nothing shall prohibit public members of the green buildings advisory committee from responding to, and being involved with, any submittals of requests for proposals, requests for information, requests for bids, requests for design/build, requests for construction managers, and any requests relating to obtaining the professional services, pricing, and construction for major facility projects by a public agency for a public facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

37-24-6.
Protection from liability.

No person, corporation, or entity shall be held liable for the failure of a public major facility project to meet the LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development, and SITES certified standard or other standards established for the project as long as a good faith attempt was made to achieve the standard set for the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.